Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.425

Appeal from refusal to approve application.

From the director of financial institutions' refusal to approve an application for conversion, the applicant may, within thirty days from the date of the mailing by the director of financial institutions of notice of refusal to approve, appeal to a board of appeal composed of the governor or the governor's designee, the attorney general, and the director of financial institutions by filing in the office of the director of financial institutions a notice that it appeals to this board from the director of financial institutions' refusal. The procedure upon the appeal shall be such as the board may prescribe, and its determination shall be certified, filed, and recorded in the same manner as the director of financial institutions', and shall be final.

[ 1994 c 92 s 394; 1981 c 85 s 84.]